Georgia statutes. TITLE 3 Alcoholic Beverages
Article 1 General Provisions
3-3-7.
Local authorization and regulation of sales of alcoholic beverages on Sunday.

In all consolidated governments of this state within the limits of which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawfully authorized, such sales for consumption on the premises shall be authorized, at the discretion of the governing body of the consolidated government, at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays and the two hours immediately following such time.

In each county having a population of 800,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 2000 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful:

The county governing authority may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays and the three hours immediately following such time; and

Alcoholic beverages may be sold on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight in public stadiums, coliseums, and auditoriums with a seating capacity in excess of 3,500 persons and in eating establishments. As used in this paragraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food.

In all municipalities having a population of 300,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful:

The municipal governing authority may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays and the three hours immediately following such time; and

Alcoholic beverages may be sold on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight in public stadiums, coliseums, and auditoriums with a seating capacity in excess of 3,500 persons; in eating establishments; and in locally designated special entertainment districts. As used in this paragraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food. As used in this paragraph, the term “special entertainment districts” means contiguous properties upon which is located a festival marketplace and entertainment project which is financed in whole or in part by public funds and which contains a minimum of 200,000 square feet of gross leasable space for retail sales and entertainment purposes and which is located in the central business district of any such municipality if more than 50 percent of such contiguous properties are owned or controlled by a governmental entity.

In each county having a population of not less than 153,000 nor more than 165,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful and in all municipalities within such counties in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises:

At any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays and the two hours immediately following such time; and

In eating establishments which are located in the unincorporated area of the county, in the case of the county, or which are located in the corporate limits of the municipality, in the case of a municipality, on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. until 12:00 Midnight. As used in this paragraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines for consumption on the premises and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food.

In each county having a population of not less than 100,000 nor more than 150,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1970 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful and in all municipalities in such counties in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in bona fide full-service restaurants at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays until 2:00 A.M. on Sundays; provided, however, that this subsection shall not apply to any geographic area of any municipal corporation which is located outside of the limits of any county in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is not lawful.

As used in this subsection, the term “bona fide full-service restaurant” means an established place of business:

Which is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages, distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines for consumption on the premises;

Where meals with substantial entrees selected by the patron from a full menu are served;

Which has adequate facilities and sufficient employees for cooking or preparing and serving such meals for consumption at tables in dining rooms on the premises; and

Which derives at least 50 percent of its gross income from the sale of such meals prepared, served, and consumed on the premises.

The governing authority of such a county or municipality, by ordinance, may authorize any other establishment otherwise licensed to sell alcoholic beverages, distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines for consumption on the premises to engage in such sales at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays until 2:00 A.M. on Sundays; provided, however, that the proviso in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall also be applicable to sales in establishments pursuant to this paragraph.

The governing authority of such a county or municipality may provide for special licenses for and charge a license fee to establishments which engage in sales of such beverages at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays until 2:00 A.M. on Sundays. The license fee shall be set by the governing body.

In each county having a population of 58,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1990, or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, alcoholic beverages may be sold for consumption on the premises on each day of the week, including Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight, on the premises of motor sport road race track facilities with a permanent seating capacity in excess of 10,000 persons. As used in this subsection, the term “premises” means restaurants, grandstands, and other event viewing areas owned, leased, or controlled by the establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines for consumption on the premises.

Reserved.

In all counties having a population of not less than 62,450 and not more than 64,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1990 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, and in all municipalities within such counties in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises if Sunday sales are approved in a referendum as provided in this subsection.

Eating establishments located in the unincorporated area of the county, in the case of the county, or eating establishments located in the corporate limits of the municipality, in the case of a municipality, shall be authorized to sell alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight. As used in this paragraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food.

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate Sunday sales shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance.

Not less than ten nor more than 20 days after the date of approval of such resolution or ordinance, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the county to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday sales to the electors of the county for approval or rejection. The superintendent shall set the date of the election for a day not less than 30 nor more than 45 days after the date of the issuance of the call. The superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published in the official organ of the county once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of Sunday sales shall vote “Yes,” and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of Sunday sales shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of Sunday sales, the governing authority in such counties and the governing authority of all municipalities within such counties may by appropriate resolution or ordinance permit and regulate Sunday sales by licensees.

The expense of the election shall be borne by the county in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

In each county having a population of more than 100,000 in any metropolitan statistical area having a population of not less than 250,000 nor more than 1,000,000 according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful in such a county and in all municipalities within such counties in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises if Sunday sales are approved by referendum as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection:

At any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays until 2:55 A.M. on Sundays; and

In eating establishments which are located in the unincorporated area of the county, in the case of the county, or which are located in the corporate limits of the municipality, in the case of a municipality, on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight. As used in this subparagraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food.

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate Sun- day sales pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance. Not less than ten nor more than 60 days after the date of approval of such resolution or ordinance, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the county or municipality to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday sales to the electors of the county or municipality for approval or rejection. The superintendent shall set the date of the election for a day not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the date of the issuance of the call. The superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published in the official organ of the county once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of Sunday sales shall vote ‘‘Yes,’’ and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of Sunday sales shall vote ‘‘No.’’ If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of Sunday sales, the governing authority may by appropriate resolution or ordinance permit and regulate Sunday sales by licensees. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, on and after May 8, 2018, in all counties or municipalities in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful for consumption on the premises, the governing authority of the county or municipality may, by resolution or ordi- nance conditioned on approval in a referendum, authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. until 12:00 Midnight in any licensed establishment which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross sales from the sale of prepared meals or food in all of the combined retail outlets of the individual establishment where food is served and in any licensed establishment which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross income from the rental of rooms for overnight lodging.

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate Sunday sales pursuant to this subsection, but only after a referendum election, shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance conditioned on a referendum. Not less than ten nor more than 60 days after the date of approval of such resolution or ordinance, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the county or municipality to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday sales to the electors of the county or municipality for approval or rejection. The superintendent shall set the date of the election for a day not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the date of the issuance of the call. The superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published in the official organ of the county once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of Sunday sales shall vote ‘‘Yes,’’ and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of Sunday sales shall vote ‘‘No.’’ If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of Sunday sales, the governing authority may by appropriate resolution or ordinance permit and regulate Sunday sales by licensees. Otherwise, such Sunday sales shall not be permitted. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his or her further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

Notwithstanding this subsection or any other provision of law, all county or municipal resolutions or ordinances enacted prior to April 6, 1984, pursuant to the authorizations granted by subsections (a) through (i) of this Code section are declared to be valid and shall remain in full force and effect unless affirmatively repealed by the governing authority of the county or municipality.

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of such Sunday sales shall vote “Yes,” and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of such Sunday sales shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of such Sunday sales, the governing authority may by appropriate resolution or ordinance permit and regulate such Sunday sales by licensees. Otherwise, such Sunday sales shall not be permitted. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his or her further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

Alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in any licensed establishment which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross sales from the sale of prepared meals or food in all of the combined retail outlets of the individual establishment where food is served and in any licensed establishment which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross income from the rental of rooms for overnight lodging; and

Packages sales of malt beverages and wine.

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of such Sunday sales shall vote “Yes,” and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of such Sunday sales shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of such Sunday sales, the governing authority may by appropriate resolution or ordinance permit and regulate such Sunday sales by licensees. Otherwise, such Sunday sales shall not be permitted. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his or her further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of such Sunday sales shall vote “Yes,” and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of such Sunday sales shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of such Sunday sales, the governing authority may by appropriate resolution or ordinance permit and regulate such Sunday sales by licensees. Otherwise, such Sunday sales shall not be permitted. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his or her further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

(j.1) (1)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, all counties or municipalities in which the governing authority prior to May 8, 2018, has been authorized pursuant to a referendum to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. until 12:00 Midnight in any licensed establishment which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross sales from the sale of prepared meals or food in all of the combined retail outlets of the individual establishment where food is served and in any licensed establishment which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross income from the rental of rooms for overnight lodging may, by resolution or ordinance conditioned on approval in a referendum, authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises of any such establishments on Sundays for an additional hour and a half during the time period of 11:00 A.M. until 12:30 P.M.

(j.2) (1)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, on and after August 3, 2020, in all counties or municipalities in which the governing authority has been authorized pursuant to a referendum held under this Code section to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. until 12:00 Midnight and has been authorized pursuant to a referendum held pursuant to subsection (p) of this Code section to permit package sales of malt beverages and wine, but not distilled spirits, on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. to 11:30 P.M., the governing authority of the county or municipality may, by resolution or ordinance conditioned on approval in a referendum, authorize on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. until 12:00 Midnight the sale of:

(j.3) (1)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, on and after August 3, 2020, in all counties or municipalities in which the governing authority has been authorized pursuant to a referendum held under this Code section to permit the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. until 12:00 Midnight and has been authorized pursuant to a referendum held under subsection (q) of this Code section to permit package sales of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays from 12:30 P.M. to 11:30 P.M., the governing authority of the county or municipality may, by resolution or ordinance conditioned on approval in a referendum, authorize on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. until 12:00 Midnight the sale of:

Notwithstanding other laws, in any county in which one-half of the net revenues collected from the legalizing, controlling, licensing, and taxing of the wholesale and retail sale of alcoholic beverages is paid over to the boards of education in such county, a municipality having an independent school system shall be authorized through its governing authority, either by proper resolution or ordinance approved by a majority of that governing authority or by proper resolution or ordinance so approved and by its terms having its effectiveness being contingent upon referendum approval pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, to allow:

If a resolution or ordinance is approved pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection and by its terms has its effectiveness contingent upon referendum approval pursuant to this paragraph, not less than ten nor more than 60 days after the date of approval of such resolution or ordinance it shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the municipality, whose governing authority approved that resolution or ordinance, to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday sales to the electors of that municipality for approval or rejection. The superintendent shall set the date of the election for a day not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the date of the issuance of the call. The superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published in the official organ of the county in which that municipality is located once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of Sunday sales shall vote “Yes,” and those persons desiring to vote for rejection of Sunday sales shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of Sunday sales, the resolution or ordinance approving such Sunday sales shall become effective upon the date so specified in that resolution or ordinance. The expense of the election shall be borne by the municipality in which the election is held. It shall be the duty of the superintendent to hold and conduct the election. It shall be his further duty to certify the result thereof to the Secretary of State.

In all counties having a population of 160,000 or more according to the United States decennial census of 1980 or any future such census in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful and in all municipalities within such counties in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises:

At any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays until 2:55 A.M. on Sundays;

In eating establishments which are located in the unincorporated area of the county, in the case of the county, or which are located in the corporate limits of the municipality, in the case of a municipality, on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight. As used in this paragraph, the term “eating establishment” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross food and beverage sales from the sale of prepared meals or food; and

In inns which are located in the unincorporated area of the county, in the case of the county, or which are located in the corporate limits of the municipality, in the case of a municipality, on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight. As used in this paragraph, the term “inn” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross income from the rental of rooms for overnight lodging.

The provisions of this subsection are in addition to or cumulative of and not in lieu of any other provisions of this title granting certain authority to a county or municipality relative to the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises.

In all municipalities or counties or in any portion of any municipality or county in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful, the governing authority of the municipality or county may authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises at any time from 11:55 P.M. on Saturdays until 2:55 A.M. on Sundays by the adoption of an ordinance or resolution. The provisions of this subsection are in addition to or cumulative of and not in lieu of any other provisions of this title granting certain authority to a county or municipality relative to the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises. Said authorization may be revoked by such governmental authority in the same manner.

A municipality in which the sale of alcoholic beverages on Sunday is authorized by any other provision of law may by the adoption of an ordinance authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages in public stadiums, coliseums and auditoriums owned or controlled by it or by a public authority and having seating capacity in excess of 2,500 people on Sunday between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and midnight.

As used in this subsection, the term “bowling center” means an establishment which is licensed to sell distilled spirits, malt beverages, or wines and which derives at least 50 percent of its total annual gross revenues either from the rental of bowling lanes and bowling equipment or from the combination of the rental of bowling lanes and bowling equipment and the sale of prepared meals and other food products.

The governing authority of any municipality or county in any portion of which the sale of alcoholic beverages is authorized may by ordinance authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises in any bowling center located within the jurisdiction of such governing authority between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 12:00 Midnight on Sundays.

Notwithstanding other laws, in each county or municipality in which package sales of malt beverages and wine by retailers are lawful, but package sales of distilled spirits by retailers are not lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., if such Sunday sales of both malt beverages and wine are approved by referendum as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection.

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate package sales by retailers of both malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance specifying the hours during such period when such package sales may occur. Upon receipt of the resolution or ordinance, the election superintendent shall issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday package sales by retailers of both malt beverages and wine to the electors of that county or municipality for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall issue the call and shall conduct the election on a date and in the manner authorized under Code Section 21-2-540. The election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for four weeks immediately preceding the date of the election in the official organ of the county. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. shall vote “Yes,” and all persons desiring to vote for rejection of package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., the resolution or ordinance approving such Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine shall become effective upon the date so specified in that resolution or ordinance. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. The election superintendent shall canvass the returns, declare the result of the election, and certify the result to the Secretary of State.

Whenever package sales of malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. are authorized by a county or municipality pursuant to this subsection, Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine may be made only by licensed retailers that are licensed to sell by the package.

The provisions of this subsection are in addition to or cumulative of and not in lieu of any other provisions of this title relative to the sale of malt beverages and wine by retailers.

(p.1)

Notwithstanding other laws, in all counties or municipalities in which package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine, but not distilled spirits, have been authorized on Sunday from 12:30 P.M. to 11:30 P.M. pursuant to a referendum held under subsection (p) of this Code section and sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. to 12:00 Midnight, including for an additional hour and a half from 11:00 A.M. to 12:30 P.M., have been authorized pursuant to a referendum held under subsection (j) or (j.1) of this Code section, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may by adoption of a resolution or ordinance allow package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine for consumption off the premises on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. until 12:00 Midnight. The provisions of this subsection are in addition to or cumulative of and not in lieu of any other provisions of this title relative to the sale of alcoholic beverages by retailers.

Notwithstanding other laws, in each county or municipality in which package sales of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits by retailers are all lawful, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may authorize package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., if such Sunday sales of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits are approved by referendum as provided in paragraph (2) of this subsection. If the governing authority seeks authorization for Sunday sales of alcoholic beverages pursuant to this subsection, the governing authority shall seek authorization of package sales by retailers of all alcoholic beverages, including malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits, and not of only one type of alcoholic beverage.

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection, shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance specifying the hours during such period when such package sales may occur. Upon receipt of the resolution or ordinance, the election superintendent shall issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits to the electors of that county or municipality for approval or rejection. The election superintendent shall issue the call and shall conduct the election on a date and in the manner authorized under Code Section 21-2-540. The election superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published once a week for four weeks immediately preceding the date of the election in the official organ of the county. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

Click to view

All persons desiring to vote for approval of package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. shall vote “Yes,” and all persons desiring to vote for rejection of package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. shall vote “No.” If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for approval of Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., the resolution or ordinance approving such Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits shall become effective upon the date so specified in that resolution or ordinance. If more than one-half of the votes cast on the question are for disapproval of Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M., such rejection shall not nullify the prior election results for approval of Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages and wine on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. pursuant to subsection (p) of this Code section. The expense of the election shall be borne by the county or municipality in which the election is held. The election superintendent shall canvass the returns, declare the result of the election, and certify the result to the Secretary of State.

Whenever package sales of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits on Sundays between the hours of 12:30 P.M. and 11:30 P.M. are authorized by a county or municipality pursuant to this subsection, Sunday package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits may be made only by licensed retailers that are licensed to sell by the package.

The provisions of this subsection are in addition to or cumulative of and not in lieu of any other provisions of this title relative to the sale of alcoholic beverages by retailers.

(q.1)

Notwithstanding other laws, in all counties or municipalities in which package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits have been authorized on Sundays beginning from 12:30 P.M. to 11:30 P.M. pursuant to a referendum held under subsection (q) of this Code section and sales of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. to 12:00 Midnight have been authorized pursuant to a referendum held under subsection (j) or (j.1) of this Code section, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may by adoption of a resolution or ordinance allow package sales by retailers of malt beverages, wine, and distilled spirits for consumption off the premises on Sundays from 11:00 A.M. until 12:00 Midnight. The provisions of this subsection are in addition to or cumulative of and not in lieu of any other provisions of this title relative to the sale of alcoholic beverages by retailers.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of law, in all counties or municipalities in which the sale of alcoholic beverages is lawful for consumption on the premises, the governing authority of the county or municipality, as appropriate, may by adoption of a resolution or ordinance authorize the sale of alcoholic beverages for consumption on the premises from 12:30 P.M. until 12:00 Midnight on one Sunday during each calendar year that shall be designated in such resolution or ordinance. Any sales for consumption on the premises made pursuant to this subsection shall be subject to such terms and conditions as may be required by the governing authority of the county or municipality.

“[] YES Shall the governing authority of (name of county) be authorized to permit and regulate Sunday sales of distilled spirits or alcoholic beverages for beverage purposes by the drink?”
[] NO

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of (name of municipality or county) be authorized to permit and regulate Sunday sales of distilled spirits or alcoholic beverages for beverage purposes by the drink?”
[
] NO

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of (name of municipality or county) be authorized to permit and regulate Sunday sales of distilled spirits or alcoholic beverages for beverage purposes by the drink?”
[
] NO

(2)

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate Sunday sales pursuant to this subsection shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance conditioned on approval in a referendum election. Not less than ten nor more than 60 days after the date of approval of such resolution or ordinance, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the county or municipality to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of Sunday sales to the electors of the county or municipality for approval or rejection. The superintendent shall set the date of the election for a day not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the date of the issuance of the call. The superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published in the official organ of the county once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of (name of municipality or county) be authorized to permit and regulate Sunday sales of distilled spirits or alcoholic beverages for beverage purposes by the drink from 11:00 A.M. to 12:30 P.M.?”
[
] NO

(3)

Notwithstanding this subsection or any other provision of law, all county or municipal resolutions or ordinances enacted prior to April 6, 1984, pursuant to the authorizations granted by subsections (a) through (i) of this Code section are declared to be valid and shall remain in full force and effect unless affirmatively repealed by the governing authority of the county or municipality.

(2)

Any governing authority desiring to permit and regulate such Sunday sales pursuant to this subsection, but only after a referendum election, shall so provide by proper resolution or ordinance conditioned on a referendum. Not less than ten nor more than 60 days after the date of approval of such resolution or ordinance, it shall be the duty of the election superintendent of the county or municipality to issue the call for an election for the purpose of submitting the question of such Sunday sales to the electors of the county or municipality for approval or rejection. The superintendent shall set the date of the election for a day not less than 30 nor more than 60 days after the date of the issuance of the call. The superintendent shall cause the date and purpose of the election to be published in the official organ of the county once a week for two weeks immediately preceding the date thereof. The ballot shall have written or printed thereon the words:

“[
] YES Shall the governing authority of (name of municipality or county) be authorized to permit and regulate Sunday sales of malt beverages and wine by the drink from 11:00 A.M. to 12:00 Midnight and Sunday sales of malt beverages and wine by the package from 11:00 A.M. to 12:00 Midnight?”
[
] NO

(3)
